Maryland, session 2025, SB0547.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(a) There is a Commission to Study Health Insurance Pooling.
(b) The Commission consists of the following members:
– 1 –

Ch. 741 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(1) one member of the Senate of Maryland who serves on the Senate
Budget and Taxation Committee, appointed by the President of the Senate;
(2) one member of the House of Delegates who serves on the House
Appropriations Committee, appointed by the Speaker of the House;
(3) one member of the House of Delegates who serves on the House Ways
and Means Committee, appointed by the Speaker of the House;
(4) the Secretary of Budget and Management, or the Secretary’s designee;
(5) the Comptroller, or the Comptroller’s designee;
(6) the Maryland Insurance Commissioner, or the Commissioner’s
designee;
(7) the State Treasurer, or the State Treasurer’s designee;
(8) the Procurement Advisor to the Board of Public Works, or the
Procurement Advisor’s designee;
(9) (8) one representative of the Maryland Public Purchasing
Association, designated by the President of the Maryland Public Purchasing Association;
(10) (9) one representative of the Maryland Association of Counties,
designated by the Executive Director of the Maryland Association of Counties;
(11) (10) one representative of the Maryland Municipal League,
designated by the Chief Executive Officer of the Maryland Municipal League;
(12) (11) one representative of the Maryland Association of Boards of
Education, designated by the President of the Maryland Association of Boards of Education;
(13) (12) one representative of the Maryland State Education Association,
designated by the President of the Maryland State Education Association;
(14) (13) one representative of the American Federation of State, County,
and Municipal Employees, designated by the President of the American Federation of
State, County, and Municipal Employees Maryland Council 3;
(15) (14) one representative of the Service Employees International
Union, designated by the President of the Service Employees International Union
Maryland/D.C. Division;
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 741
(16) (15) one representative of the American Federation of Labor and
Congress of Industrial Organizations, designated by the President of the Maryland State
and D.C. American Federation of Labor and Congress of Industrial Organizations;
(17) (16) one representative of the American Federation of Teachers,
designated by the President of the American Federation of Teachers–Maryland; and
(18) (17) the following members, appointed by the Governor:
(i) four additional representatives of labor unions in the State,
including unions representing law enforcement and firefighters;
(ii) one individual who is an insurance agent in the State; and
(iii) four individuals with interest or experience in health care
advocacy or fiscal responsibility and efficiency in the State, who may be representatives of
advocacy organizations or research institutes.
(c) The Secretary of Budget and Management shall serve as the chair of the
Commission.
(d) The Department of Budget and Management shall provide staff for the
Commission.
(e) A member of the Commission:
(1) may not receive compensation as a member of the Commission; but
(2) is entitled to reimbursement for expenses under the Standard State
Travel Regulations, as provided in the State budget.
(f) The Commission may contract with external organizations to provide data
analysis necessary to fulfill the Commission’s duties under subsection (g).
(g) The Commission shall:
(1) study pooling public employee health insurance purchasing between
the State, counties, municipal corporations, and county boards of education using data
collected by the Department of Budget and Management, including information provided
by the Maryland Association of Counties, the Maryland Municipal League, and the
Maryland Association of Boards of Education regarding health insurance benefits offered
to public employees by the constituent entities;
(2) based on the data collected under item (1) of this subsection, analyze
the impacts of pooling public employee health insurance purchasing between the State,
counties, municipal corporations, and county boards of education on the State, including
– 3 –

Ch. 741 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
the fiscal impacts, and identify any barriers to achieving the successful implementation of
pooling public employee health insurance purchasing in the State; and
(3) make legislative or regulatory recommendations regarding pooling
public employee health insurance purchasing between the State, counties, municipal
corporations, and county boards of education in the State to maximize value and efficiency
while maintaining a broad package of benefits and reasonable premiums for public
employees.
(h) On or before December 1, 2026, the Commission shall report its findings and
recommendations to the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State
Government Article, the General Assembly.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025. It shall remain effective for a period of 2 years and, at the end of June 30, 2027,
this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and
of no further force and effect.
Approved by the Governor, May 20, 2025.
– 4 –